Utah statutes.
31A-18-102.   Separate account investments.
(1)  Except as provided under Subsection (2), each separate account
established under Section 31A-5-217 shall be evaluated as a separate insurer
to determine whether the account complies with Chapters 17 and 18.
(2)  Except as provided under Subsection (3), the amounts allocated to each
separate account, and accumulations thereon, may be invested and reinvested
without regard to any requirements or limitations prescribed by Chapter 18.
(3)  To the extent that the corporation's reserve liability, with regard to
benefits guaranteed as to dollar amount and duration and funds guaranteed as
to principal amount or stated rate of interest, is maintained in any separate
account, a portion of the assets of the account at least equal to the reserve
liability shall be invested in accordance with this chapter, or in accordance
with such requirements as the commissioner prescribes by rule.
(4)  Assets allocated to a separate account shall be valued at market value on
the date of valuation, or, if there is no readily available market, then in
accordance with the applicable contract.  However, a portion of the assets of
the account at least equal to the corporation's reserve liability with regard
to the guaranteed benefits and funds referred to in Subsection (3), if any,
shall be reported separately and valued in accordance with the rules otherwise
applicable to the corporation's assets or in accordance with rules adopted
under Subsection (3).  No securities valuation reserve or other reserve for
fluctuation in the value of securities is required for assets that do not have
to comply with this chapter.
